Hawaii statutes.
[§196-66] Use of Hawaii green
infrastructure special fund; application. (a) The authority shall apply
to the public utilities commission for one or more orders to effectuate the
Hawaii green infrastructure loan program, pursuant to section 269-170.

Nothing herein shall preclude the department
from applying for a financing order, pursuant to section 269-162, prior to the
issuance of an order or orders to effectuate the Hawaii green infrastructure
loan program under section 269-171, nor from requesting consolidation of the
proceeding for a financing order with such a loan program implementation order.

(b) An application shall be submitted by the
authority to the public utilities commission in accordance with section 269‑170.

(c) In accordance with an approved green
infrastructure loan program order or orders, the authority shall utilize the
proceeds of bonds and other amounts deposited in the Hawaii green
infrastructure special fund pursuant to [section] 196-65, or to the extent
permitted by a financing order, to pay financing costs, as defined in section 269-161.

(d) Within the order or orders issued by the
public utilities commission under section 269-171, the authority shall obtain
approval from the public utilities commission requiring the electric utilities
to serve as agents to bill and collect the green infrastructure charge imposed
to repay green infrastructure costs and transfer all green infrastructure
charges collected to the authority on behalf of the department.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, electric utilities shall not be
obligated to bill, collect, or remit green infrastructure charges from
nonutility customers. [L 2013, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next